hw_3_foma/span.foma
# Cons
define C [ d | n ];

read lexc span.lexc
define Lexicon;

define IrDeletion i r -> 0 || _ "^" ;

define EReplacement e -> i || _ C "^" [ o | e s | e | e n ] ;

define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

regex Lexicon .o.
      IrDeletion .o.
      EReplacement .o.
      Cleanup;
